Illinois, session 104th, SB2619.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Department of Government Efficiency Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7        (1) Illinois has a long-standing reputation for 8    government inefficiency, excessive spending, and wasteful 9    bureaucracy.10        (2) Illinois ranks among the most corrupt States in 11    the nation, with repeated scandals involving public 12    officials misusing taxpayer dollars for personal or 13    political gain.14        (3) Illinois taxpayers are burdened by the highest 15    property taxes in the nation, yet face crumbling 16    infrastructure, substandard services, and failing schools.17        (4) The so-called "woke agenda" has infiltrated 18    government institutions, diverting attention from real 19    issues and forcing taxpayers to foot the bill for radical 20    policies that undermine efficiency, fairness, and 21    merit-based governance.22        (5) The people of Illinois deserve a government that 23    prioritizes taxpayers over bureaucrats, real results over   SB2619- 2 -LRB104 12340 BDA 22520 b1    ideological virtue signaling, and efficient, accountable 2    service over political correctness.3        (6) Modernizing government operations through 4    technology and efficiency measures has proven effective in 5    reducing costs and enhancing service delivery in both the 6    private and public sectors.7        (7) Restoring public trust in Illinois government 8    requires bold action to root out waste, fraud, and abuse 9    while demonstrating a commitment to serving the people 10    effectively.11        (8) Creating a Department of Government Efficiency 12    will restore trust, eliminate waste, and refocus Illinois 13    government on its core mission: serving the people. 14    Section 10. Establishment of the Department of Government 15Efficiency. The Department of Government Efficiency is created 16to oversee, audit, and recommend improvements to all State 17agencies' operations, budgets, and practices. 18    Section 15. Leadership. The Department of Government 19Efficiency shall consist of 6 voting members as follows:20        (1) One member appointed by the Governor.21        (2) One member appointed by the Speaker of the House.22        (3) One member appointed by the President of the 23    Senate.24        (4) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the   SB2619- 3 -LRB104 12340 BDA 22520 b1    House.2        (5) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 3    Senate.4        (6) One member appointed by the Illinois Legislative 5    Freedom Caucus.6    Elon Musk, or the Administrator of the United States DOGE 7Service Temporary Organization, shall serve as an honorary 8advisory member without voting rights, unless he or she 9resides in Illinois, and shall provide guidance to ensure 10Illinois adopts cutting-edge solutions, including 11technological innovations. 12    Section 20. Mission. The mission of the Department of 13Government Efficiency is to:14        (1) ensure all State operations are focused solely on 15    serving the needs of Illinois taxpayers and delivering 16    measurable results;17        (2) eliminate wasteful programs, streamline services, 18    and hold government agencies accountable for their 19    performance; and20        (3) defeat the woke mind virus and root out 21    ideological indoctrination and policies driven by radical, 22    partisan agendas that prioritize political correctness 23    over common sense, merit, and efficient governance. 24    Section 25. Powers and duties. The Department of   SB2619- 4 -LRB104 12340 BDA 22520 b1Government Efficiency has the following powers and duties:2        (1) Conduct mandatory annual audits to eliminate 3    waste, inefficiencies, and radical policies in all State 4    agencies.5        (2) Review and recommend repealing programs or 6    expenditures that prioritize ideology over taxpayer 7    benefits.8        (3) Establish clear Key Performance Indicators for 9    every State agency to measure efficiency and 10    effectiveness.11        (4) Consolidate overlapping programs and services 12    across State agencies.13        (5) Implement technological solutions to improve 14    transparency and streamline operations, including 15    artificial intelligence and blockchain tools. 16    Section 30. Implementation Timeline.17    (a) The Department of Government Efficiency shall be 18operational no later than 3 months after the effective date of 19this Act.20    (b) All State agencies must submit initial efficiency 21plans to the Department of Government Efficiency within 12 22months after the Department of Government Efficiency's 23establishment.24    (c) A report on the progress of the Department of 25Government Efficiency shall be released by the Department of   SB2619- 5 -LRB104 12340 BDA 22520 b1Government Efficiency 60 days after the completion of the 2first year of the Department of Government Efficiency's 3operations.4    (d) The Department of Government Efficiency shall submit 5quarterly reports to the General Assembly summarizing 6achievements, challenges, and recommendations. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.